Illinois, session 104th, SB2883.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Human 5Services Workforce Sustainability Act. 6    Section 5. Findings and purpose. The purpose of this Act 7is to invest in community-based human service providers so 8they can pay fair, competitive wages to their workers. 9Building on House Resolution 151 of the 104th General 10Assembly, this Act supports the more than 350,000 historically 11underpaid human service workers who provide vital services to 12all communities across Illinois. Research conducted by 13Illinois Partners for Human Service found that 82% of 14frontline human service workers self-report not making a 15living wage. Providers overwhelmingly report that these low 16wages are a result of low reimbursement rates and insufficient 17State contracts that do not keep up with the cost of doing 18business. Further research from the Illinois Partners' 19"Essential Expenses" report found that the actual cost of 20overhead expenses is on average 29% of their organizational 21budgets, leaving organizations to not only face low-wage 22opportunities for their workers but also key administrative 23costs hanging in the balance. As reported by the U.S. Bureau of   SB2883- 2 -LRB104 17108 KTG 30527 b1Labor Statistics, the inflation rate of the Consumer Price 2Index between July 2020 and July 2025 is 24.7%, situating 3community-based providers in an environment where their 4funding today needs to be at least 25% more than what it was in 52020 to grow and sustain the human services workforce. This 6Act honors their contributions and helps ensure they can 7thrive in the communities they serve.  8    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:9    "Consumer Price Index" or "CPI" means the index published 10by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States 11Department of Labor that measures the average change in prices 12of goods and services purchased by all urban consumers, United 13States city average, all items, 1982-84 = 100.14    "Grantee" or "subgrantee" means an eligible human services 15organization that receives grant funding or reimbursements, 16including those reimbursed via rate-based structures, from an 17eligible State agency.18    "Human services organization" means a private nonprofit 19organization that primarily operates for the purposes of 20providing direct or indirect services in the areas of child 21care and early education services, community-integrated living 22arrangements, domestic violence prevention and recovery, 23foster care services, health care and wellness services, 24homeless and supportive housing services, immigrant supportive 25services, intellectual or developmental disability services,   SB2883- 3 -LRB104 17108 KTG 30527 b1mobile crisis response, older adult services, workforce 2development, youth services, mental services, and behavioral 3health and substance use services. "Human services 4organizations" may also include any nonprofit organizations 5not captured in the fields listed in the previous sentence 6that provide services that ensure individuals have the 7essential elements to build and maintain physical, emotional, 8and economic well-being at every phase of life, as indicated 9by providing examples of current or completed successful 10programs that satisfy this definition. "Human services 11organization" does not include colleges and universities, 12local government agencies, correctional centers and county 13jails, non-safety net hospitals, State police or municipal 14police departments, or any public or private preschools, 15elementary schools, or high schools.16    "Human services professional" means any individual 17employed by a human services organization that contracts with, 18receives funding from, or is grant-funded by a State agency 19for the purposes of providing direct or indirect services that 20ensure that individuals have the essential elements to build 21and maintain physical, emotional, and economic well-being at 22every phase of life.23    "State agency" means the Department of Human Services, the 24Department of Children and Family Services, the Department of 25Juvenile Justice, the Department on Aging, the Department of 26Public Health, the Department of Commerce and Economic   SB2883- 4 -LRB104 17108 KTG 30527 b1Opportunity, the Illinois Criminal Justice Information 2Authority, the Department of Early Childhood, and the Illinois 3State Board of Education. 4    Section 15. Establishing minimum grant levels. 5    (a) By June 30, 2027, each State agency must complete a 6look-back calculation for each grantee and subgrantee that 7compares the funding amount awarded to the grantee or 8subgrantee in State fiscal years 2026 and 2021 in order to 9identify the percentage change in funding, if any, to the 10grantee or subgrantee between those fiscal years.11    (b) Based on the look-back calculations required under 12subsection (a), each State agency shall identify the total 13aggregate amount of additional appropriations needed to ensure 14that grant amounts awarded by the State agency in State Fiscal 15Year 2028 are at least 25% more than the grant amounts awarded 16to grantees and subgrantees in State Fiscal Year 2021.17    (c) By October 1, 2027, each State agency shall make 18available to the public, upon request, the look-back 19calculations and additional appropriation amounts identified 20in subsections (a) and (b). 21    Section 20. Implementation.22    (a) The calculations and findings under Section 15 shall 23inform each State agency on the percentage increase in funding 24each grantee and subgrantee must receive in State Fiscal Year   SB2883- 5 -LRB104 17108 KTG 30527 b12028 to ensure the total grant amount a grantee or subgrantee 2receives is (i) at least 25% higher than the grant amount 3awarded to the grantee or subgrantee in State Fiscal Year 2021 4and (ii) no less than the grant amount awarded to the grantee 5or subgrantee in State Fiscal Year 2027.6    (b) Beginning in State Fiscal Year 2029, and in each State 7fiscal year thereafter, all grantees and subgrantees shall 8receive the same grant amount it received in the previous 9State fiscal year, plus the greater of:10        (1) a 3% increase; or11        (2) the percentage increase in the Consumer Price 12    Index during the 12-month calendar year preceding the 13    grant year.14    (c) Nothing in this Section prohibits a State agency from 15increasing a grantee's or subgrantee's grant amount for State 16Fiscal Year 2027, and every State fiscal year thereafter, 17above the 25% minimum grant increase required under subsection 18(b) of Section 15 and subsection (a) of this Section.19    (d) Implementation of the grant increases required under 20this Act is contingent on the availability of appropriations. 21    Section 25. Limitations. Grantees and subgrantees shall 22expend a minimum of 70% of any increased grant funding they 23receive directly to improve the wages and benefits of their 24workers. For purposes of this subsection, benefits may include 25health insurance, retirement plans, paid time off, life and   SB2883- 6 -LRB104 17108 KTG 30527 b1disability insurance, tuition reimbursement offerings, 2childcare assistance, commuter benefits, and mental health 3support and other wellness programs. Any remaining funds at 430% or less may be used at the discretion of the grantees and 5subgrantees. 6    Section 30. Certification. State agencies shall require 7each grantee and subgrantee to certify in accordance with 8existing budget review and reporting processes that the 9grantee or subgrantee used any increased grant funding it 10received in accordance with this Act to improve the wages and 11benefits of human service professionals employed by the 12grantee or subgrantee.  13    Section 35. Oversight. The Department of Central 14Management Services shall hire by June 30, 2027 a full-time 15Director of Human Services Wage Equity to: 16        (1) provide oversight to the implementation of this 17    Act;18        (2) support the State agencies in identifying the 19    funding amounts necessary to comply with the requirements 20    of Section 20; and21        (3) monitor the State agencies to ensure continued 22    compliance and implementation of the funding increases 23    described under Section 20.   SB2883- 7 -LRB104 17108 KTG 30527 b1    Section 40. Administration. Each State agency shall adopt 2rules, not inconsistent with this Act, to implement the 3provisions of this Act. 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 52026.